Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.210

Submission of claims in general receiverships.

(1) All claims, whether contingent, liquidated, unliquidated, or disputed, other than claims of creditors with security interests in or other liens against property of the estate, arising prior to the receiver's appointment, must be served in accordance with this chapter, and any claim not so filed is barred from participating in any distribution to creditors in any general receivership.

(2) Claims must be served by delivering the claim to the general receiver within thirty days from the date notice is given by mail under this section, unless the court reduces or extends the period for cause shown, except that a claim arising from the rejection of an executory contract or an unexpired lease of the person over whose property the receiver is appointed may be filed within thirty days after the rejection. Claims need not be filed. Claims must be served by state agencies on the general receiver within one hundred eighty days from the date notice is given by mail under this section.

(3) Claims must be in written form entitled "Proof of Claim," setting forth the name and address of the creditor and the nature and amount of the claim, and executed by the creditor or the creditor's authorized agent. When a claim, or an interest in estate property of securing the claim, is based on a writing, the original or a copy of the writing must be included as a part of the proof of claim, together with evidence of perfection of any security interest or other lien asserted by the claimant.

(4) A claim, executed and served in accordance with this section, constitutes prima facie evidence of the validity and amount of the claim.

[ 2004 c 165 s 23.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.